California, session 20252026, AB339.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3504.1 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 3504, to read:3504.1. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the governing body of a public agency, and boards and commissions designated by law or by the governing body of a public agency, shall give the recognized employee organization no less than 45 days’ written notice before issuing a request for proposals, request for quotes, or renewing or extending an existing contract, to perform services that are within the scope of work of the job classifications represented by the recognized employee organization.(b) The written notice specified in subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:(1) The anticipated duration of the contract.(2) The scope of work under the contract.(3) The anticipated cost of the contract.(4) The draft solicitation, or if not yet drafted, any information that would normally be included in a solicitation.(5) The reason the public agency believes the contract is necessary.(c) If an emergency or other exigent circumstance prevents the public agency from providing the amount of notice required by subdivision (a), the public agency shall provide as much advance notice as is practicable under the circumstances.(d) This section does not apply to any of the following contracts:(1) A contract for construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or maintenance work that is subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code or a contract for highly specialized data, software, or services related to that construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or maintenance work.(2) A contract for services described in Section 4525 or 4529.10 or that is related to the planning, design, administration, oversight, review, or delivery of public works, residential, commercial, or industrial buildings, or other infrastructure projects subject to adopted uniform codes or standards.(e) (1) Nothing in this section exempts contracts from the notice, meet and confer, or other requirements of applicable laws, including this chapter.(2) This section shall not be interpreted to affect other bargaining rights and obligations under this chapter that were not created by this section.(3) This section shall not diminish any rights of an employee or recognized employee organization provided by a memorandum of understanding.(4) This section shall not invalidate any provision of a memorandum of understanding in effect on the operative date of this section.SEC. 2. No reimbursement shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code for costs mandated by the state pursuant to this act. It is recognized, however, that a local agency or school district may pursue any remedies to obtain reimbursement available to it under Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) and any other law.